Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3408
Election; statutes; applicability.

The statutes of this state relating to election officers, voting places, election apparatus and blanks, preparation and form of ballots, information to voters, delivery of ballots, calling of elections, conduct of elections, manner of voting, counting of votes, records and certificates of election, and recounts of votes, so far as applicable, shall apply to voting on the question of establishing a budget limitation by the voters under the provisions of sections 77-3401 to 77-3411.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 8.